Illinois, session 104th, HB1211.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 52-3.206 and by changing Sections 21A-25, 21B-20, and 21B-40 as 6follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)8    Sec. 2-3.206. Temporary Teacher Apprentice Program.9    (a) In this Section:10    "Mentor teacher" means an individual who (i) holds a 11Professional Educator License, (ii) has at least 7 years of 12classroom experience, (iii) has an "excellent" rating on his 13or her 2 most recent teacher evaluations, and (iv) has 14volunteered to serve as a mentor teacher under this Section. A 15school district may not require a teacher to assume the role of 16mentor teacher under this Section.17    "Qualified participant" means an individual who (i) holds 18a high school diploma or its recognized equivalent, (ii) holds 19an associate degree or has completed a minimum of 60 semester 20hours of coursework from a regionally accredited institution 21of higher education, (iii) has at least a 3.0 cumulative grade 22point average upon receiving the associate degree or 23completing the coursework at the regionally accredited   HB1211- 2 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1institution of higher education, (iv) is enrolled in the 2Temporary Teacher Apprentice Program under this Section, and 3(v) is seeking a bachelor's degree from a regionally 4accredited institution of higher education in this State.5    (b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, the State 6Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 7Preparation and Licensure Board, shall establish and maintain 8a Temporary Teacher Apprenticeship Program to assist qualified 9participants in acquiring a Professional Educator License. The 10State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 11Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may establish and 12adopt any rules necessary to implement this Section, including 13the standards that a qualified participant must meet to 14receive a Professional Educator License under Section 21B-20 15of this Code.16    (c) In order to successfully complete the Temporary 17Teacher Apprentice Program, a qualified participant must:18        (1) receive his or her bachelor's degree within 3 19    years after receiving a temporary teacher apprentice 20    endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations under 21    subparagraph (O) of paragraph (2) of Section 21B-20 of 22    this Code; however, the qualified participant is not 23    required to receive a bachelor's degree from an educator 24    preparation program; and25        (2) spend 2 full school years as a temporary teacher 26    apprentice working one-on-one under a mentor teacher to   HB1211- 3 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1    develop the qualified participant's pedagogy skills by 2    assisting the mentor teacher in creating classroom 3    curriculum and lesson plans, grading and evaluating 4    students, and all other aspects of classroom activity 5    performed by the mentor teacher.6    (d) Upon completing the requirements set forth in 7subsection (c) of this Section, a qualified participant is 8eligible for a Professional Educator License under Section 921B-20 of this Code. However, before the qualified participant 10receives a Professional Educator License, the mentor teacher 11and the school principal shall certify to the State Board of 12Education, in a form developed and prescribed by the State 13Board, that the qualified participant is eligible to receive a 14Professional Educator License. In order to receive a grade 15level or subject endorsement, the qualified participant must 16pass the applicable content area test, but the qualified 17participant is not required to pass a teacher performance 18assessment prior to receiving a Professional Educator License 19under Section 21B-20 of this Code.20    (e) Each qualified participant shall receive pay while 21serving in that capacity for no more than 2 school years. 22Mentor teachers shall receive a paid bonus at the end of each 23school year in which they serve as a mentor teacher for the 24full school year. The rate of pay for the qualified 25participant and the rate of the bonus pay for the mentor 26teacher shall be determined by the school board, in accordance   HB1211- 4 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1with the school district's applicable collective bargaining 2agreement, if any. A school district may use appropriate 3State, federal, or local revenue to issue pay or bonus pay 4under this subsection (e).5    Subject to appropriation by the General Assembly for 6grants associated with Article 21A of this Code, the State 7Board of Education may issue grants to school districts to 8cover the costs associated with mentor teachers in accordance 9with subsection (c) of Section 21A-25 of this Code.  10    (105 ILCS 5/21A-25)11    Sec. 21A-25. Funding. 12    (a) From a separate appropriation made for the purposes of 13this Article, for each new teacher participating in a new 14teacher induction and mentoring program that meets the 15requirements set forth in Section 21A-20 of this Code or in an 16existing program that is in the process of transition to a 17program that meets those requirements, the State Board of 18Education shall pay the eligible entity for the duration of 19the grant for the purpose of providing the following:20        (1) Mentor teacher compensation and new teacher 21    compensation.22        (2) Mentor teacher professional learning or new 23    teacher learning or both.24        (3) (Blank).25    (b) Each school district shall decide, in conjunction with   HB1211- 5 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1its exclusive bargaining representative, if any, which 2eligible applicant offers the most suitable program. If a 3mentor teacher receives release time to support a new teacher, 4the total workload of other teachers regularly employed by the 5public school shall not increase in any substantial manner. If 6the appropriation is not included in the State budget, the 7State Board of Education is not required to implement programs 8established by this Article. 9    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 10subject to appropriation of funding under this Section, the 11State Board of Education shall allocate no more than 25% of the 12appropriation level for this Section to provide mentor teacher 13grants under Section 2-3.206 of this Code. School districts 14participating in the Temporary Teacher Apprentice Program 15shall apply to the State Board for funding. No school district 16may receive a grant of more than $2,000 per mentor teacher. If 17allocated funds are less than the amount needed to fully fund 18grants of $2,000 per mentor teacher, the grants shall be 19issued on a prorated basis. 20(Source: P.A. 102-521, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    (105 ILCS 5/21B-20)22    Sec. 21B-20. Types of licenses. The State Board of 23Education shall implement a system of educator licensure, 24whereby individuals employed in school districts who are 25required to be licensed must have one of the following   HB1211- 6 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1licenses: (i) a professional educator license; (ii) an 2educator license with stipulations; (iii) a substitute 3teaching license; or (iv) until June 30, 2028, a short-term 4substitute teaching license. References in law regarding 5individuals certified or certificated or required to be 6certified or certificated under Article 21 of this Code shall 7also include individuals licensed or required to be licensed 8under this Article. The first year of all licenses ends on June 930 following one full year of the license being issued.10    The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 11State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may adopt such 12rules as may be necessary to govern the requirements for 13licenses and endorsements under this Section. 14        (1) Professional Educator License. Persons who (i) 15    have successfully completed an approved educator 16    preparation program and are recommended for licensure by 17    the Illinois institution offering the educator preparation 18    program, (ii) have successfully completed the required 19    testing under Section 21B-30 of this Code, (iii) have 20    successfully completed coursework on the psychology of, 21    the identification of, and the methods of instruction for 22    the exceptional child, including, without limitation, 23    children with learning disabilities, (iv) have 24    successfully completed coursework in methods of reading 25    and reading in the content area, and (v) have met all other 26    criteria established by rule of the State Board of   HB1211- 7 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1    Education or persons who have successfully completed the 2    Temporary Teacher Apprentice Program under Section 2-3.206 3    of this Code shall be issued a Professional Educator 4    License. All Professional Educator Licenses are valid 5    until June 30 immediately following 5 years of the license 6    being issued. The Professional Educator License shall be 7    endorsed with specific areas and grade levels in which the 8    individual is eligible to practice. For an early childhood 9    education endorsement, an individual may satisfy the 10    student teaching requirement of his or her early childhood 11    teacher preparation program through placement in a setting 12    with children from birth through grade 2, and the 13    individual may be paid and receive credit while student 14    teaching. The student teaching experience must meet the 15    requirements of and be approved by the individual's early 16    childhood teacher preparation program.17        Individuals can receive subsequent endorsements on the 18    Professional Educator License. Subsequent endorsements 19    shall require a minimum of 24 semester hours of coursework 20    in the endorsement area and passage of the applicable 21    content area test, unless otherwise specified by rule.22        (2) Educator License with Stipulations. An Educator 23    License with Stipulations shall be issued an endorsement 24    that limits the license holder to one particular position 25    or does not require completion of an approved educator 26    program or both.  HB1211- 8 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        An individual with an Educator License with 2    Stipulations must not be employed by a school district or 3    any other entity to replace any presently employed teacher 4    who otherwise would not be replaced for any reason.5        An Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 6    with the following endorsements:7            (A) (Blank). 8            (B) Alternative provisional educator. An 9        alternative provisional educator endorsement on an 10        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued to an 11        applicant who, at the time of applying for the 12        endorsement, has done all of the following:13                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 14            college or university with a minimum of a 15            bachelor's degree.16                (ii) Successfully completed the first phase of 17            the Alternative Educator Licensure Program for 18            Teachers, as described in Section 21B-50 of this 19            Code.20                (iii) Passed a content area test, as required 21            under Section 21B-30 of this Code.22        The alternative provisional educator endorsement is 23    valid for 2 years of teaching and may be renewed for a 24    third year by an individual meeting the requirements set 25    forth in Section 21B-50 of this Code. 26            (C) Alternative provisional superintendent. An   HB1211- 9 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        alternative provisional superintendent endorsement on 2        an Educator License with Stipulations entitles the 3        holder to serve only as a superintendent or assistant 4        superintendent in a school district's central office. 5        This endorsement may only be issued to an applicant 6        who, at the time of applying for the endorsement, has 7        done all of the following:8                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 9            college or university with a minimum of a master's 10            degree in a management field other than education.11                (ii) Been employed for a period of at least 5 12            years in a management level position in a field 13            other than education.14                (iii) Successfully completed the first phase 15            of an alternative route to superintendent 16            endorsement program, as provided in Section 21B-55 17            of this Code.18                (iv) Passed a content area test required under 19            Section 21B-30 of this Code.20            The endorsement is valid for 2 fiscal years in 21        order to complete one full year of serving as a 22        superintendent or assistant superintendent.23            (D) (Blank).24            (E) Career and technical educator. A career and 25        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 26        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who   HB1211- 10 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        has a minimum of 60 semester hours of coursework from a 2        regionally accredited institution of higher education 3        or an accredited trade and technical institution and 4        has a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience outside of 5        education in each area to be taught.6            The career and technical educator endorsement on 7        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 8        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 9        endorsement being issued and may be renewed.10            An individual who holds a valid career and 11        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 12        with Stipulations but does not hold a bachelor's 13        degree may substitute teach in career and technical 14        education classrooms. 15            An individual who holds a valid career and 16        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 17        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 18        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 19        Educator License. 20            (F) (Blank).21            (G) Transitional bilingual educator. A 22        transitional bilingual educator endorsement on an 23        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued for 24        the purpose of providing instruction in accordance 25        with Article 14C of this Code to an applicant who 26        provides satisfactory evidence that he or she meets   HB1211- 11 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        all of the following requirements:2                (i) Possesses adequate speaking, reading, and 3            writing ability in the language other than English 4            in which transitional bilingual education is 5            offered.6                (ii) Has the ability to successfully 7            communicate in English.8                (iii) Either possessed, within 5 years 9            previous to his or her applying for a transitional 10            bilingual educator endorsement, a valid and 11            comparable teaching certificate or comparable 12            authorization issued by a foreign country or holds 13            a degree from an institution of higher learning in 14            a foreign country that the State Educator 15            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 16            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 17            regionally accredited institution of higher 18            learning in the United States.19            A transitional bilingual educator endorsement 20        shall be valid for prekindergarten through grade 12, 21        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 22        of the endorsement being issued, and shall not be 23        renewed.24            Persons holding a transitional bilingual educator 25        endorsement shall not be employed to replace any 26        presently employed teacher who otherwise would not be   HB1211- 12 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        replaced for any reason. 2            (H) Language endorsement. In an effort to 3        alleviate the shortage of teachers speaking a language 4        other than English in the public schools, an 5        individual who holds an Educator License with 6        Stipulations may also apply for a language 7        endorsement, provided that the applicant provides 8        satisfactory evidence that he or she meets all of the 9        following requirements:10                (i) Holds a transitional bilingual 11            endorsement. 12                (ii) Has demonstrated proficiency in the 13            language for which the endorsement is to be issued 14            by passing the applicable language content test 15            required by the State Board of Education.16                (iii) Holds a bachelor's degree or higher from 17            a regionally accredited institution of higher 18            education or, for individuals educated in a 19            country other than the United States, holds a 20            degree from an institution of higher learning in a 21            foreign country that the State Educator 22            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 23            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 24            regionally accredited institution of higher 25            learning in the United States.26                (iv) (Blank).  HB1211- 13 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1            A language endorsement on an Educator License with 2        Stipulations is valid for prekindergarten through 3        grade 12 for the same validity period as the 4        individual's transitional bilingual educator 5        endorsement on the Educator License with Stipulations 6        and shall not be renewed.7            (I) Visiting international educator. A visiting 8        international educator endorsement on an Educator 9        License with Stipulations may be issued to an 10        individual who is being recruited by a particular 11        school district that conducts formal recruitment 12        programs outside of the United States to secure the 13        services of qualified teachers and who meets all of 14        the following requirements:15                (i) Holds the equivalent of a minimum of a 16            bachelor's degree issued in the United States.17                (ii) Has been prepared as a teacher at the 18            grade level for which he or she will be employed.19                (iii) Has adequate content knowledge in the 20            subject to be taught.21                (iv) Has an adequate command of the English 22            language.23            A holder of a visiting international educator 24        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 25        shall be permitted to teach in bilingual education 26        programs in the language that was the medium of   HB1211- 14 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        instruction in his or her teacher preparation program, 2        provided that he or she passes the English Language 3        Proficiency Examination or another test of writing 4        skills in English identified by the State Board of 5        Education, in consultation with the State Educator 6        Preparation and Licensure Board.7            A visiting international educator endorsement on 8        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid for 5 9        years and shall not be renewed.10            (J) Paraprofessional educator. A paraprofessional 11        educator endorsement on an Educator License with 12        Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who holds a 13        high school diploma or its recognized equivalent and 14        (i) holds an associate's degree or a minimum of 60 15        semester hours of credit from a regionally accredited 16        institution of higher education; (ii) has passed a 17        paraprofessional competency test under subsection 18        (c-5) of Section 21B-30; or (iii) is at least 18 years 19        of age and will be using the Educator License with 20        Stipulations exclusively for grades prekindergarten 21        through grade 8, until the individual reaches the age 22        of 19 years and otherwise meets the criteria for a 23        paraprofessional educator endorsement pursuant to this 24        subparagraph (J). The paraprofessional educator 25        endorsement is valid until June 30 immediately 26        following 5 years of the endorsement being issued and   HB1211- 15 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        may be renewed through application and payment of the 2        appropriate fee, as required under Section 21B-40 of 3        this Code. An individual who holds only a 4        paraprofessional educator endorsement is not subject 5        to additional requirements in order to renew the 6        endorsement.7            (K) Chief school business official. A chief school 8        business official endorsement on an Educator License 9        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 10        qualifies by having a master's degree or higher, 2 11        years of full-time administrative experience in school 12        business management or 2 years of university-approved 13        practical experience, and a minimum of 24 semester 14        hours of graduate credit in a program approved by the 15        State Board of Education for the preparation of school 16        business administrators and by passage of the 17        applicable State tests, including an applicable 18        content area test. 19            The chief school business official endorsement may 20        also be affixed to the Educator License with 21        Stipulations of any holder who qualifies by having a 22        master's degree in business administration, finance, 23        accounting, or public administration and who completes 24        an additional 6 semester hours of internship in school 25        business management from a regionally accredited 26        institution of higher education and passes the   HB1211- 16 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        applicable State tests, including an applicable 2        content area test. This endorsement shall be required 3        for any individual employed as a chief school business 4        official. 5            The chief school business official endorsement on 6        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 7        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 8        endorsement being issued and may be renewed if the 9        license holder completes renewal requirements as 10        required for individuals who hold a Professional 11        Educator License endorsed for chief school business 12        official under Section 21B-45 of this Code and such 13        rules as may be adopted by the State Board of 14        Education. 15            The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules 16        necessary to implement Public Act 100-288.17            (L) Provisional in-state educator. A provisional 18        in-state educator endorsement on an Educator License 19        with Stipulations may be issued to a candidate who has 20        completed an Illinois-approved educator preparation 21        program at an Illinois institution of higher education 22        and who has not successfully completed an 23        evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness but 24        who meets all of the following requirements: 25                (i) Holds at least a bachelor's degree.26                (ii) Has completed an approved educator   HB1211- 17 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1            preparation program at an Illinois institution.2                (iii) Has passed an applicable content area 3            test, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code.4                (iv) Has attempted an evidence-based 5            assessment of teacher effectiveness and received a 6            minimum score on that assessment, as established 7            by the State Board of Education in consultation 8            with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 9            Board.10            A provisional in-state educator endorsement on an 11        Educator License with Stipulations is valid for one 12        full fiscal year after the date of issuance and may not 13        be renewed.14            (M) (Blank).15            (N) Specialized services. A specialized services 16        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 17        may be issued as defined and specified by rule. 18            (O) Provisional career and technical educator. A 19        provisional career and technical educator endorsement 20        on an Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 21        to an applicant who has a minimum of 8,000 hours of 22        work experience in the skill for which the applicant 23        is seeking the endorsement. Each employing school 24        board and regional office of education shall provide 25        verification, in writing, to the State Superintendent 26        of Education at the time the application is submitted   HB1211- 18 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        that no qualified teacher holding a Professional 2        Educator License or an Educator License with 3        Stipulations with a career and technical educator 4        endorsement is available to teach and that actual 5        circumstances require such issuance.6            A provisional career and technical educator 7        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 8        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 9        of the endorsement being issued and may be renewed.10            An individual who holds a provisional career and 11        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 12        with Stipulations may teach as a substitute teacher in 13        career and technical education classrooms. 14            An individual who holds a provisional career and 15        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 16        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 17        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 18        Educator License. 19            (P) Temporary teacher apprentice. A temporary 20        teacher apprentice endorsement on an Educator License 21        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who is 22        a qualified participant in the Temporary Teacher 23        Apprentice Program under Section 2-3.206 of this Code. 24        The temporary teacher apprenticeship endorsement is 25        valid until June 30 of the school year for which the 26        endorsement is issued and is not renewable.   HB1211- 19 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1            (Q) Foreign language endorsement. A foreign 2        language endorsement on an Educator License with 3        Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 4        provides satisfactory evidence that he or she meets 5        all of the following requirements: 6                (i) Possesses adequate speaking, reading, and 7            writing ability in a language other than English. 8                (ii) Has the ability to successfully 9            communicate in English. 10                (iii) Has demonstrated proficiency in the 11            language for which the endorsement is to be issued 12            by passing the applicable language content test 13            required by the State Board of Education; however, 14            if the language for which the endorsement is to be 15            issued is the applicant's first language, the 16            applicant shall not be required to pass the 17            applicable language content test in order to 18            receive the foreign language endorsement under 19            this subparagraph (Q). 20            The foreign language endorsement on an Educator 21        License with Stipulations is valid until the June 30 22        following the fifth anniversary of the endorsement's 23        issuance. 24            An individual who holds a valid foreign language 25        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 26        may teach a course on the foreign language for which   HB1211- 20 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1        the foreign language endorsement is issued. 2            An individual who holds a valid foreign language 3        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 4        but does not hold a bachelor's degree and who is 25 5        years of age or older may substitute teach in foreign 6        language classrooms. 7        (3) Substitute Teaching License. A Substitute Teaching 8    License may be issued to qualified applicants for 9    substitute teaching in all grades of the public schools, 10    prekindergarten through grade 12. Substitute Teaching 11    Licenses are not eligible for endorsements. Applicants for 12    a Substitute Teaching License must hold a bachelor's 13    degree or higher from a regionally accredited institution 14    of higher education or must be enrolled in an approved 15    educator preparation program in this State and have earned 16    at least 90 credit hours.17        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 5 years.18        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for substitute 19    teaching in every county of this State. If an individual 20    has had his or her Professional Educator License or 21    Educator License with Stipulations suspended or revoked, 22    then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 23    Substitute Teaching License.24        A substitute teacher may only teach in the place of a 25    licensed teacher who is under contract with the employing 26    board. If, however, there is no licensed teacher under   HB1211- 21 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1    contract because of an emergency situation, then a 2    district may employ a substitute teacher for no longer 3    than 30 calendar days per each vacant position in the 4    district if the district notifies the appropriate regional 5    office of education within 5 business days after the 6    employment of the substitute teacher in that vacant 7    position. A district may continue to employ that same 8    substitute teacher in that same vacant position for 90 9    calendar days or until the end of the semester, whichever 10    is greater, if, prior to the expiration of the 11    30-calendar-day period then current, the district files a 12    written request with the appropriate regional office of 13    education for a 30-calendar-day extension on the basis 14    that the position remains vacant and the district 15    continues to act    ively seek qualified candidates and 16    provides documentation that it has provided training 17    specific to the position, including training on meeting 18    the needs of students with disabilities and English 19    learners if applicable. Each extension request shall be 20    granted in writing by the regional office of education. An 21    emergency situation is one in which an unforeseen vacancy 22    has occurred and (i) a teacher is unexpectedly unable to 23    fulfill his or her contractual duties or (ii) teacher 24    capacity needs of the district exceed previous indications 25    or vacancies are unfilled due to a lack of qualified 26    candidates, and the district is actively engaged in   HB1211- 22 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1    advertising to hire a fully licensed teacher for the 2    vacant position.3        There is no limit on the number of days that a 4    substitute teacher may teach in a single school district, 5    provided that no substitute teacher may teach for longer 6    than 120 days beginning with the 2021-2022 school year 7    through the 2022-2023 school year, otherwise 90 school 8    days for any one licensed teacher under contract in the 9    same school year. A substitute teacher who holds a 10    Professional Educator License or Educator License with 11    Stipulations shall not teach for more than 120 school days 12    for any one licensed teacher under contract in the same 13    school year. The limitations in this paragraph (3) on the 14    number of days a substitute teacher may be employed do not 15    apply to any school district operating under Article 34 of 16    this Code.17        A school district may not require an individual who 18    holds a valid Professional Educator License or Educator 19    License with Stipulations to seek or hold a Substitute 20    Teaching License to teach as a substitute teacher. 21        (4) Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. Beginning 22    on July 1, 2018 and until June 30, 2028, applicants may 23    apply to the State Board of Education for issuance of a 24    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. A Short-Term 25    Substitute Teaching License may be issued to a qualified 26    applicant for substitute teaching in all grades of the   HB1211- 23 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1    public schools, prekindergarten through grade 12. 2    Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are not eligible 3    for endorsements. Applicants for a Short-Term Substitute 4    Teaching License must hold an associate's degree or have 5    completed at least 60 credit hours from a regionally 6    accredited institution of higher education.7        Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 8    substitute teaching in every county of this State. If an 9    individual has had his or her Professional Educator 10    License or Educator License with Stipulations suspended or 11    revoked, then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 12    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License.13        The provisions of Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this 14    Code apply to short-term substitute teachers. 15        An individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 16    License may teach no more than 15 consecutive days per 17    licensed teacher who is under contract. For teacher 18    absences lasting 6 or more days per licensed teacher who 19    is under contract, a school district may not hire an 20    individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 21    License, unless the Governor has declared a disaster due 22    to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 23    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. An individual 24    holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License must 25    complete the training program under Section 10-20.67 or 26    34-18.60 of this Code to be eligible to teach at a public   HB1211- 24 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1    school. Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses under this 2    Section are valid for 5 years. 3(Source: P.A. 102-711, eff. 1-1-23; 102-712, eff. 4-27-22; 4102-713, eff. 1-1-23; 102-717, eff. 4-29-22; 102-894, eff. 55-20-22; 103-111, eff. 6-29-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 6103-193, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23; 103-617, eff. 77-1-24.) 8    (105 ILCS 5/21B-40)9    Sec. 21B-40. Fees.10    (a) Beginning with the start of the new licensure system 11established pursuant to this Article, the following fees shall 12be charged to applicants:13        (1) A $100 application fee for a Professional Educator 14    License or an Educator License with Stipulations.15        (1.5) A $50 application fee for a Substitute Teaching 16    License. If the application for a Substitute Teaching 17    License is made and granted after July 1, 2017, the 18    licensee may apply for a refund of the application fee 19    within 18 months of issuance of the new license and shall 20    be issued that refund by the State Board of Education if 21    the licensee provides evidence to the State Board of 22    Education that the licensee has taught pursuant to the 23    Substitute Teaching License at least 10 full school days 24    within one year of issuance. 25        (1.7) A $25 application fee for a Short-Term   HB1211- 25 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1    Substitute Teaching License. The Short-Term Substitute 2    Teaching License must be registered in at least one region 3    in this State, but does not require a registration fee. 4    The licensee may apply for a refund of the application fee 5    within 18 months of issuance of the new license and shall 6    be issued that refund by the State Board of Education if 7    the licensee provides evidence to the State Board of 8    Education that the licensee has taught pursuant to the 9    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License at least 10 full 10    school days within one year of issuance. The application 11    fee for a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License shall be 12    waived when the Governor has declared a disaster due to a 13    public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 14    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 15        (2) A $150 application fee for individuals who have 16    not been entitled by an Illinois-approved educator 17    preparation program at an Illinois institution of higher 18    education and are seeking any of the licenses set forth in 19    subdivision (1) of this subsection (a).20        (3) A $50 application fee for each endorsement or 21    approval.22        (4) A $10 per year registration fee for the course of 23    the validity cycle to register the license, which shall be 24    paid to the regional office of education having 25    supervision and control over the school in which the 26    individual holding the license is to be employed. If the   HB1211- 26 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1    individual holding the license is not yet employed, then 2    the license may be registered in any county in this State. 3    The registration fee must be paid in its entirety the 4    first time the individual registers the license for a 5    particular validity period in a single region. No 6    additional fee may be charged for that validity period 7    should the individual subsequently register the license in 8    additional regions. An individual must register the 9    license (i) immediately after initial issuance of the 10    license and (ii) at the beginning of each renewal cycle if 11    the individual has satisfied the renewal requirements 12    required under this Code.13        Beginning on July 1, 2017, at the beginning of each 14    renewal cycle, individuals who hold a Substitute Teaching 15    License may apply for a reimbursement of the registration 16    fee within 18 months of renewal and shall be issued that 17    reimbursement by the State Board of Education from funds 18    appropriated for that purpose if the licensee provides 19    evidence to the State Board of Education that the licensee 20    has taught pursuant to the Substitute Teaching License at 21    least 10 full school days within one year of renewal. 22        (5) The license renewal fee for an Educator License 23    with Stipulations with a paraprofessional educator 24    endorsement is $25. 25    (a-5) An applicant for a temporary teacher apprentice 26endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations may not   HB1211- 27 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1be charged an application fee. 2    (b) All application fees paid pursuant to subdivisions (1) 3through (3) of subsection (a) of this Section shall be 4deposited into the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund and 5shall be used, subject to appropriation, by the State Board of 6Education to provide the technology and human resources 7necessary for the timely and efficient processing of 8applications and for the renewal of licenses. Funds available 9from the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund may also be 10used by the State Board of Education to support the 11recruitment and retention of educators, to support educator 12preparation programs as they seek national accreditation, and 13to provide professional development aligned with the 14requirements set forth in Section 21B-45 of this Code. A 15majority of the funds in the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving 16Fund must be dedicated to the timely and efficient processing 17of applications and for the renewal of licenses. The Teacher 18Certificate Fee Revolving Fund is not subject to 19administrative charge transfers, authorized under Section 8h 20of the State Finance Act, from the Teacher Certificate Fee 21Revolving Fund into any other fund of this State, and moneys in 22the Teacher Certificate Fee Revolving Fund shall not revert 23back to the General Revenue Fund at any time.24    The regional superintendent of schools shall deposit the 25registration fees paid pursuant to subdivision (4) of 26subsection (a) of this Section into the institute fund   HB1211- 28 -LRB104 03532 LNS 13555 b1established pursuant to Section 3-11 of this Code.2    (c) The State Board of Education and each regional office 3of education are authorized to charge a service or convenience 4fee for the use of credit cards for the payment of license 5fees. This service or convenience fee shall not exceed the 6amount required by the credit card processing company or 7vendor that has entered into a contract with the State Board or 8regional office of education for this purpose, and the fee 9must be paid to that company or vendor.10    (d) If, at the time a certificate issued under Article 21 11of this Code is exchanged for a license issued under this 12Article, a person has paid registration fees for any years of 13the validity period of the certificate and these years have 14not expired when the certificate is exchanged, then those fees 15must be applied to the registration of the new license.16(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-570, eff. 8-23-19; 17102-867, eff. 5-13-22.) 18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192025.